Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.768

Statewide drug overdose prevention and awareness campaign.

(1) The department shall develop, implement, and maintain a statewide drug overdose prevention and awareness campaign to address the drug overdose epidemic.

(2)(a) The campaign must educate the public about the dangers of methamphetamines and opioids, including fentanyl, and the harms caused by drug use. The campaign must include outreach to both youth and adults aimed at preventing substance use and overdose deaths.

(b) The department, in consultation with the health care authority, may also include messaging focused on substance use disorder and overdose death prevention, resources for addiction treatment and services, and information on immunity for people who seek medical assistance in a drug overdose situation pursuant to RCW 69.50.315.

(3) The 2024 and 2025 campaigns must focus on increasing the awareness of the dangers of fentanyl and other synthetic opioids, including the high possibility that other drugs are contaminated with synthetic opioids and that even trace amounts of synthetic opioids can be lethal.

(4) Beginning June 30, 2025, and each year thereafter, the department must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the content and distribution of the statewide drug overdose prevention and awareness campaign. The report must include a summary of the messages distributed during the campaign, the mediums through which the campaign was operated, and data on how many individuals received information through the campaign. The department must identify measurable benchmarks to determine the effectiveness of the campaign and recommend whether the campaign should continue and if any changes should be made to the campaign. The report must be submitted in compliance with RCW 43.01.036.

[ 2024 c 216 s 1.]